Alabama, session 2026rs, HB592.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1.(a) For purposes of this section, "qualified
private school employment" means full-time employment of a
certificated teacher at an accredited private school.
(b) Commencing with the 2026-2027 school year, upon
employment by a public K-12 school, a teacher who has a
minimum of five years of previous qualified private school
employment shall receive half a year salary adjustment on the
State Minimum Salary Schedule for each year of that service.
The minimum adjustment shall be a two and one-half year
Page 1

The minimum adjustment shall be a two and one-half year
HB592 INTRODUCED
adjustment for five years of qualified private school
employment and the maximum adjustment shall be a 10-year
adjustment for 20 years of previous qualified private school
employment.
(c) A teacher with qualified private school employment
who transferred to public K-12 school employment between June
1, 2022, and the beginning of the 2026-2027 school year, may
claim and receive the salary adjustment pursuant to this
section provided they submit a request and applicable
documentation of their qualified private school employment to
the local superintendent of education during the 2026-2027
school year.
(d) Years served in qualified private school employment
may not be counted toward retirement.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 2